District of Columbia statutes.
34-1671.09

Information to be provided to the Commission.

(a)

A natural gas supplier shall provide the Commission with such information regarding its retail natural gas sales as the Commission considers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The Commission shall take such measures as it considers necessary to protect the confidentiality of such information.

(b)

The Commission shall require a licensed natural gas supplier to file an annual financial report regarding those retail natural gas sales for which it is subject to licensure.

History

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 10, 51 DCR 10549